Missouri, session 2026, SB1062.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 660, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 660.365, to read as
follows:
660.365. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Charity Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Missouri partner network", a group of entities,
including state departments and agencies, public-private
partnerships, and nonprofit, private-sector, and faith-based
organizations, which provides goods or services to directly
support the participants' goals and address identified
barriers;
(2) "Participant", an individual who voluntarily
participates in the charity program;
(3) "Participating state agency", a state department,
division, or agency that takes part in the charity program
at the direction of the governor.
3. (1) There shall be created within the department
of social services the "Charity" program. The department,
in consultation with the office of the governor, shall:


(a) Facilitate coordination and collaboration among
participating state agencies to implement the provisions of
this section;
(b) Expand the Missouri partner network to meet the
needs of participants;
(c) Empower and assist participants in need to help
identify and achieve immediate, intermediate, and long-term
goals and remove barriers to achievement of personal goals;
(d) Use participating state agencies to serve families
holistically in achieving self-sufficiency, maximizing
community integration, and building a prosperous future.
Barriers to self-sufficiency may include the inability to:
a. Obtain stable employment;
b. Increase wages;
c. Obtain the necessary skills for greater
independence, education, or training;
d. Meet basic needs; and
e. Find stable housing; and
(g) Refer participants requiring assistance with
employment or vocational training to appropriate entities to
prepare, train, and place the participants in meaningful
employment.
(2) (a) To participate in the charity program, an
individual shall be:
a. A legal resident of this state;
b. A citizen of the United States or a permanent
resident alien of the United States, as determined by the
U.S. Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services;
c. (i) At least eighteen years of age;
(ii) If emancipated, at least sixteen years of age; or
(iii) If under eighteen years of age and not
emancipated, authorized to participate by written consent of
his or her parent or guardian.


(b) Participation in the charity program is voluntary.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Develop and maintain a website for individuals to
connect with the charity program; and
(b) Develop and maintain a charity program case
management system that, at a minimum, conducts intake for
charity program inquiries and makes referrals for
individuals and families in need of services.
4. (1) The Missouri partner network shall work to
build a network of partnerships to sustain the effectiveness
of the charity program.
(2) (a) State agencies shall participate in the
charity program at the direction of the governor.
(b) In order to use government resources more
effectively and efficiently, participating state agencies
shall use existing resources and personnel, to the extent
possible, to operate the charity program.